pt-BR: Tipo de acionamento do motor de arranque: Acionamento direto; Inércia/Bendix; Embreagem de roda livre; Pré-engatado; Outro
vi: Kiểu truyền động bộ khởi động: Dẫn động trực tiếp; Quán tính/Bendix; Ly hợp quá tốc; Khớp răng trước (Pre-engaged); Khác
zh-TW: 啟動器驅動類型: 直驅式; 慣性式/本迪克斯; 單向離合器; 預嚙合式; 其他
ru: Тип привода стартера: Прямой привод; Инерционный/бендикс; С обгонной муфтой; С предварительным зацеплением; Другой
ko: 스타터 드라이브 유형: 다이렉트 드라이브; 관성/벤딕스; 오버러닝 클러치; 사전 맞물림; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta starter pogona: Izravni pogon; Inercijski/Bendix; Jednosmjerna spojka; Pred-uključivanje; Ostalo
zh-CN: 起动机驱动类型: 直驱式; 惯性式/本迪克斯式; 单向离合器; 预啮合式; 其他
sv: Typ av startdrivning: Direktdrift; Bendix-drev; Frihjulskoppling; Förinrullad; Övrigt
tr: Marş tahrik tipi: Doğrudan tahrik; Atalet/Bendix; Tek yönlü kavrama; Ön kavramalı; Diğer
cs: Typ pohonu startéru: Přímý pohon; Setrvačníkový / Bendix; Volnoběžka; S předstihem (pre-engaged); Jiné
ja: スターター駆動タイプ: ダイレクトドライブ; 慣性 / ベンディックス; オーバーランニングクラッチ; プレエンゲージメント; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de acionamento do motor de arranque: Tração direta; Inércia/Bendix; Embraiagem de roda livre; Pré-engrenado; Outro
en: Starter drive type: Direct drive; Inertia/Bendix; Overrunning clutch; Pre-engaged; Other
hu: Indítómotor hajtástípusa: Közvetlen hajtás; Inerciális (Bendix); Szabadonfutó tengelykapcsoló; Előre kapcsolt; Egyéb
nb: Type drev i startmotor: Direktedrevet; Treghet/Bendix; Friløpskobling; Forhåndsinnkoblet; Annet
de: Art des Anlassers: Direktantrieb; Trägheits-/Bendix-Antrieb; Freilaufkupplung; Schubschraubtrieb; Sonstige
nl: Type startmotor-aandrijving: Directe aandrijving; Inertie/Bendix; Vrijloopkoppeling; Pre-engaged; Overige
bg-BG: Тип стартерно задвижване: Директно задвижване; Инерционно/Бендикс; Съединител със свободен ход; Предварително зацепено; Друго
fi: Starttimoottorin käyttölaitteen tyyppi: Suoraveto; Inertia/Bendix; Vapaakytkin; Esikytkeytyvä; Muu
el: Τύπος εκκίνησης: Άμεσης μετάδοσης (Direct drive); Αδράνειας/Bendix; Συμπλέκτης υπέρβασης (Overrunning clutch); Προεμπλοκής (Pre-engaged); Άλλο
fr: Type d'entraînement du démarreur: Prise directe; À inertie/Bendix; Embrayage à roue libre; Pré-engrené; Autre
lt-LT: Starterio pavaros mechanizmo tipas: Tiesioginės pavaros; Inercinė / „Bendix“; Laisvosios eigos movos; Išankstinio sukabinimo; Kita
sk-SK: Typ pohonu štartéra: Priamy pohon; Zotrvačný/Bendix; Voľnobežná spojka; S výsuvným pastorkom; Iné
es: Tipo de accionamiento del motor de arranque: Transmisión directa; Inercia/Bendix; Embrague de rueda libre; Preengranado; Otro
pl: Typ napędu rozrusznika: Napęd bezpośredni; Bezwładnościowy/Bendix; Ze sprzęgłem jednokierunkowym; Z zębnikiem przesuwnym; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta zaganjalnega pogona: Neposredni pogon; Inercijski pogon/Bendix; Prostoteka sklopka; S predvklopom; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de antrenare a electromotorului: Transmisie directă; Inerție/Bendix; Ambreiaj de depășire; Pre-cuplat; Altele
it: Tipo di trasmissione Starter: A presa diretta; A inerzia/bendix; A ruota libera; A innesto preventivo; Altro
th: ประเภทกลไกขับสตาร์ทเตอร์: ขับตรง; อินเนอร์เชีย/เบนดิกซ์; คลัตช์ทางเดียว; พรีเอนเกจ; อื่นๆ
da: Type af startdrev: Direkte drevet; Træghed/Bendix; Friløbskobling; Forskudt indgreb; Andet